District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
67 act may be cited as the "Campaign Finance Modernization Amendment Act of 2025".
68 Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Election Code of 1955, approved August 12, 1955 (69
69 Stat. 699; D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
70 (a) Section 17 (D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.17) is amended as follows:
71 (1) Subsection (d)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “10 calendar days” and
72 inserting the phrase “10 business days” in its place.
73 (2) Subsection (f) is amended as follows:
74 (A) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
75 a semicolon in its place.
76 (B) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
77 phrase “; and” in its place.
78 (C) A new paragraph (7) is added to read as follows:
2

79 “(7) If the petition was printed and circulated by a political committee, political
80 action committee, or independent expenditure committee other than the political committee
81 created in support of the recall:
82 “(A) The name of the political committee, political action committee, or
83 independent expenditure committee; and
84 “(B) The date when the political committee, political action committee, or
85 independent expenditure committee printed and circulated the petition.”.
86 (3) Subsection (h)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “30 days prior to the date
87 of initial submission to the Board of the notice of intention to recall” and inserting the phrase “30
88 days prior to submission of the signatures for the particular recall petition” in its place.
89 (4) Subsection (i) is amended as follows:
90 (A) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a
91 semicolon in its place.
92 (B) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
93 phrase “; or” in its place.
94 (C) A new paragraph (7) is added to read as follows:
95 “(7) The petition contains pages that were printed and circulated by a political
96 committee, political action committee, or independent expenditure committee other than the
97 political committee created in support of the recall, and the number of pages marked as such
98 pursuant to subsection (f)(7) of this section would result in the petition clearly bearing on its face
99 an insufficient number of signatures to qualify for the ballot.”.
100 Sec. 3. The Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and
101 Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment Act of 2011, effective April 27, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-
3

102 124; D.C. Official Code § 1-1161.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
103 (a) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.01) is amended as follows:
104 (1) Paragraph (10B)(A) is amended to read as follows:
105 “(10B)(A) “Coordinate” or “coordination” means to take an action, including
106 making a contribution or expenditure:
107 “(i) At the explicit or implicit direction, request, or suggestion of a
108 public official, political committee, political action committee, independent expenditure
109 committee, or agent of a political committee, political action committee, or independent
110 expenditure committee; or
111 “(ii) In cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or with other
112 material involvement of a public official, political committee, political action committee,
113 independent expenditure committee, or agent of a political committee, political action
114 committee, or independent expenditure committee.
115 “(B) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a contribution or an
116 expenditure is coordinated with a public official, political committee, political action committee,
117 independent expenditure committee, or agent of a political committee, political action
118 committee, or independent expenditure committee, if:
119 “(i) The contribution or expenditure is made based on information
120 that the public official, political committee, political action committee, independent expenditure
121 committee, or agent of a political committee, political action committee, or independent
122 expenditure committee, provided to the particular person making the contribution or expenditure
123 about its needs or plans, including information about campaign messaging or planned
124 expenditures;
4

125 “(ii) The person making the contribution or expenditure retains the
126 professional services of a person who also provides the public official, political committee,
127 political action committee, independent expenditure committee, or agent of a political
128 committee, political action committee, or independent expenditure committee with professional
129 services related to campaign or fundraising strategy;
130 “(iii) The person making the contribution or expenditure is a
131 political committee, political action committee, or independent expenditure committee that was
132 established or is or was staffed in a leadership role by an individual who:
133 “(I) Works or previously worked in a senior position or in
134 an advisory capacity on a public official’s staff, public official’s principal campaign committee,
135 or other political committee; or
136 “(II) Who is a member of the public official’s or political
137 committee chair or treasurer’s immediate family; or
138 “(iv) The contribution or expenditure is made for the purpose of
139 financing, directly or indirectly, the election of a candidate or a political committee affiliated
140 with that candidate, and that candidate has fundraised for the person making the expenditure.
141 “(C) There shall be a rebuttable presumption of coordination when a
142 political committee, political action committee, or independent expenditure committee adopts the
143 same or substantially similar messaging, communications, or advertising as another political
144 committee, political action committee, or independent expenditure committee.”.
145 (b) Section 303 (D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.03) is amended as follows:
146 (1) Subsection (c) is amended by adding a new paragraph (6) to read as follows:
5

147 “(6) The Director of Campaign Finance shall make available to the public, on the
148 Office of Campaign Finance’s website, a current, electronic docket of all complaints made to the
149 agency and agency investigations, including all filings and determinations filed with or issued by
150 the agency and orders, opinions, motions, and responses pertaining to those complaints and
151 investigations.”.
152 (2) New subsections (d) and (e) are added to read as follows:
153 “(d)(1) Upon receiving a complaint of an alleged violation of this chapter, the Director of
154 Campaign Finance shall acknowledge receipt to the complainant within 2 business days and
155 inform them of the docket complaint number assigned to the complaint.
156 “(2) If the Director of Campaign Finance, in their discretion, decides to
157 investigate the matter alleged in the complaint for investigation, the Director of Campaign
158 Finance shall have no longer than 60 days from the date of receipt of the complaint for
159 investigation to:
160 “(A) Cause evidence to be presented to the Board, if sufficient evidence
161 exists constituting an apparent violation of this chapter;
162 “(B) Dismiss the complaint, if insufficient evidence exists to present the
163 matter; or
164 “(C) Impose civil penalties upon a determination that a violation of this
165 chapter occurred.
166 “(e) The Director of Campaign Finance shall inform the complainant of the result of the
167 investigation at its conclusion.”.
168 (c) Section 304 (D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.04) is amended as follows:
6

169 (1) Paragraph (8A) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
170 semicolon in its place.
171 (2) New paragraphs (8B), (8C), (8D), and (8E) are added to read as follows:
172 “(8B)Upon the commencement of each election cycle, revise, publish, and
173 disseminate to all candidates and committees a guide that contains all required filing deadlines,
174 references to statutory and regulatory provisions that may impact a candidate or committee’s
175 operations, and responses to frequently asked questions received by the Director of Campaign
176 Finance regarding the Fair Elections Program or the traditional program.
177 “(8C) Publish, revise, and disseminate a lay-friendly guide that contains
178 information to covered contractors, candidates, and committees about covered contractor
179 contributions, as detailed in section 334a of this act.
180 “(8D) Publish all documents pertaining to an investigation, including orders,
181 opinions, motions, and responses, online in a publicly accessible, widely accepted,
182 nonproprietary, searchable, platform-independent, sortable, computer-readable format within 24
183 hours.
184 “(8E) Convene at least 4 times a year an advisory group consisting of current and
185 former campaign treasurers, campaign finance experts, and donation platforms to consult on
186 potential process improvements for the campaign finance system and the Fair Elections Program;
187 and”.
188 (d) Section 309 (D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.09) is amended as follows:
189 (1) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
190 “(b) All committees shall file the reports required by subsection (a) of this section on the
191 following dates:
7

192 “(1) March 10, June 10, August 10, September 10, October 10, November 10, and
193 December 10 in the 7 months preceding the date on which an election is held for which the
194 candidate seeks office and the committee supports a candidate for office;
195 “(2) January 31, March 10, June 10, August 10, September 10, October 10,
196 November 10, and December 10 and the 8th day next preceding the date of any election, in any
197 year in which there is held an election for which the candidate seeks office and the committee
198 supports a candidate for office;
199 “(3) January 31, March 10, June 10, August 10, and December 10; provided, that
200 a committee no later than January 31 declares its intention to not support a candidate during an
201 election year under 3 DCMR § 3000.18; and
202 “(4) January 31, March 10, June 10, August 10, and December 10, in a non-
203 election year; provided, that a committee no later than January 31 of the non-election year
204 declares its intention to not support a candidate during an election year under 3 DCMR §
205 3000.18.”.
206 (2) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:
207 “(g) The Director of Campaign Finance shall not accept a report required by subsection
208 (a) of this section where the report does not comply with the requirements laid out in subsection
209 (c)(2) of this section.”.
210 (e) Section 313(a)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.13(a)(1)) is amended by striking the
211 phrase “any public official, political committee affiliated with a public official, or an agent of a
212 public official or political committee affiliated with a public official” and inserting the phrase
213 “public official, political committee, political action committee, independent expenditure
8

214 committee, or agent of a political committee, political action committee, or independent
215 expenditure committee” in its place.
216 (f) A new section 315a is added to read as follows:
217 “Sec. 315a. Additional identification of political advertising using artificial media.
218 “(a) A candidate, political action committee, political committee, independent
219 expenditure committee, or an agent of a candidate, political action committee, political
220 committee, or independent expenditure committee, or person that publishes, distributes, or
221 disseminates, or causes to be published, distributed, or disseminated, to a person in the District,
222 campaign material that is produced using or containing artificial media shall include the
223 following disclosure:
224 “(1)(A) For media that is only a still image, the disclosure shall include the
225 statement, “This image has been altered or modified through the use of artificial intelligence or
226 other digital technology to display an appearance or conduct that did not occur.”.
227 “(B) The statement required under subparagraph (A) of this subsection
228 shall be written in a type size that is:
229 “(i) Easily readable by the average viewer; and
230 “(ii) Not smaller than the largest type size of other text appearing
231 in the still image.
232 “(2)(A) For media that is only an audio recording, the disclosure shall include the
233 statement, “This audio has been altered or modified through the use of artificial intelligence or
234 other digital technology to display a sound or voice that did not occur.”.
235 “(B) The statement required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
236 be read:
9

237 “(i) In a clearly spoken manner and in a pitch that can be easily
238 heard by the average listener; and
239 “(ii) At the beginning of the audio recording, at the end of the
240 audio recording, and if the audio is greater than two minutes in length, interspersed within the
241 audio at intervals of not greater than two minutes each.
242 “(3)(A) For media that is a video recording, the disclosure shall include the
243 statement, “This video has been altered or modified through the use of artificial intelligence or
244 other digital technology to display an appearance, conduct, sound, or voice that did not occur.”.
245 “(B) The statement required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
246 be written in:
247 “(i) Text that remains visible to the viewer for the duration of the
248 video recording; and
249 “(ii) In a type size that is easily readable to the average viewer and
250 placed in a conspicuous location in the frame of the video.
251 “(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a candidate, political action
252 committee, political committee, independent expenditure committee, or an agent of a candidate,
253 political action committee, political committee, or independent expenditure committee, or person
254 shall not, within 90 days of an election at which a candidate will appear on the ballot, initiative,
255 referendum, or recall, publish, distribute, or disseminate artificial media that the person knows or
256 should have known is artificial media.
257 “(c) A candidate, political action committee, political committee, or independent
258 expenditure committee, or person whose appearance, conduct, sound, or voice is represented
259 through the use of artificial media in violation of this section may seek injunctive or other
10

260 equitable relief in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia prohibiting the publication of
261 the artificial media.
262 “(d) A candidate, political action committee, political committee, independent
263 expenditure committee or agent of a candidate, political action committee, political committee,
264 or independent expenditure committee, or person that violates the provisions of this section, in
265 addition to any other penalty provided by law, may be assessed a civil penalty by the Campaign
266 Finance Board of not more than $10,000 for the first offense and not more than $20,000 for the
267 second and each subsequent offense.
268 “(e) For purposes of this section, “artificial media” in political advertising means an
269 image, audio recording, or video of an individual’s appearance, conduct, sound, or voice that has
270 been fully or partially created or intentionally manipulated or modified with the use of generative
271 artificial intelligence or other digital technology in a manner to create or produce a realistic but
272 false image, audio, or video, that:
273 “(1) Depicts a candidate, political action committee, political committee,
274 independent expenditure committee, or agent of a candidate, political action committee, political
275 committee, or independent expenditure committee, or person with the intent to injure the
276 reputation of the candidate, political action committee, political committee, independent
277 expenditure committee, or agent of a candidate, political action committee, political committee,
278 or independent expenditure committee, or person or otherwise deceive a voter; or
279 “(2) Appears to a reasonable person to depict a real individual, the individual’s
280 speech, or the individual’s conduct that did not actually occur.
281 “(f) This section does not apply to:
11

282 “(1) A provider of an interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. §
283 230(f), or an information service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153;
284 “(2) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite
285 television operator, programmer, or producer, that broadcasts artificial media prohibited by this
286 section as part of a bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, or on-the-spot
287 coverage of bona fide news events, if the broadcast clearly acknowledges through content or a
288 disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or read by the average listener or viewer, that
289 there are questions about the authenticity of the materially artificial audio or visual media, or in
290 cases where federal law requires broadcasters to air advertisements from legally qualified
291 candidates;
292 “(3) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite
293 television operator, programmer, or producer, when it is paid to broadcast artificial audio or
294 visual media and has made a reasonable effort to establish the depiction is not artificial audio or
295 visual media, or in cases where federal law requires broadcasters to air advertisements from
296 legally qualified candidates;
297 “(4) An internet service or website provider, or a regularly published newspaper,
298 magazine, or other periodical of general circulation, including an internet or electronic
299 publication, that routinely carries news and commentary of general interest, and that publishes
300 materially artificial audio or visual media prohibited by this section, if the publication clearly
301 states that the materially artificial audio or visual media does not accurately represent the speech
302 or conduct of the candidate;
303 “(5) Content that constitutes satire or parody.”.
304 (g) A new section 327a is added to read as follows:
12

305 “Sec. 327a. Fund balance and duration requirements for recall committees.
306 “(a) Any surplus, residual, or unexpended campaign funds received by a political
307 committee in support or opposition to a recall shall be:
308 “(1) Transferred to:
309 “(A) A political committee;
310 “(B) A nonprofit organization within the meaning of section 501(c) of the
311 Internal Revenue Code, operating in good standing in the District for a minimum of one calendar
312 year before the date of any transfer; or
313 “(2) Returned to the donors as follows:
314 “(A) In the case of an election where a recall is successful, within 6
315 months after the election; or
316 “(B) In the case of a recall where the recall fails to gain ballot access,
317 within 6 months after the date the Board of Elections announces as the date to file the recall
318 petition with the Board of Elections.
319 “(b) The duration of a political committee in support or opposition to a recall shall
320 terminate either:
321 “(1) 6 months after an election to recall a public official, if the recall obtains
322 ballot access; or
323 “(2) 6 months after the date the Board of Elections announces as the date to file
324 the recall petition with the Board of Elections, if the recall does not obtain ballot access.”.
325 (h) Section 332c (D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.32c) is amended as follows:
326 (1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended as follows:
13

327 (A) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “300 small-dollar
328 contributors, which, in the aggregate, total $15,000” and inserting the phrase “500 small-dollar
329 contributors, which, in the aggregate, total $20,000” in its place.
330 (B) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the phrase “250 small-dollar
331 contributors, which, in the aggregate, total $12,000” and inserting the phrase “350 small-dollar
332 contributors, which, in the aggregate total $17,500” in its place.
333 (C) Subparagraph (E) is amended by striking the phrase “at least 150
334 small-dollar contributors, which, in the aggregate, total $5,000” and inserting the phrase “at least
335 200 small-dollar contributors, which, in the aggregate, total $8,000” in its place.
336 (2) Subsection (c) is amended by adding a new paragraph (3A) to read as follows:
337 “(3A) Loses in the primary election for the covered office as a certified candidate
338 and runs for a different covered office in the general election.”.
339 (3) Subsection (e) is amended to read as follows:
340 “(e)(1) Within 5 business days after the receipt of a report made under section 309(a), (b-
341 1), the Director of Campaign Finance shall direct the Office of the Chief Financial Officer to
342 disburse payments under this section. The Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall disburse the
343 payments within 5 business days after receiving direction to do so from the Director of
344 Campaign Finance.
345 “(2) For reports filed within the last 60 days of a primary or general election,
346 within 3 business days after receipt, the Director of Campaign Finance shall direct the Office of
347 the Chief Financial Officer to disburse payments under this section. The Office of the Chief
348 Financial Officer shall disburse the payments within 3 business days after receiving direction to
349 do so from the Director of Campaign Finance.”.
14

350 (4) A new subsection (f) is added to read as follows:
351 “(f) The Director of Campaign Finance shall not certify a participating candidate for a
352 seat for a covered office in an election cycle if the candidate was expelled by the Council
353 pursuant to section 401(e) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, effective July 31, 2013
354 (D.C. Law 19-124A; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.01(e)).
355 (i) Section 332h (D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.32h) is amended as follows:
356 (1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
357 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “No later than 60
358 days” and inserting the phrase “No later than 120 days” in its place.
359 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “No later than 60
360 days” and inserting the phrase “No later than 120 days” in its place.
361 (2) Subsection (b)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “No later than 60 days”
362 and inserting the phrase “No later than 120 days” in its place.
363 (3) Subsection (c) is amended by “striking the phrase “an additional 180 days
364 after the 60-day periods in subsections (a) and (b) of this section if the participating candidate
365 submits documentation of the funds to the Director of Campaign Finance no later than the last
366 day of the 60-day period” and inserting the phrase “an additional 90 days after the 120-day
367 periods in subsections (a) and (b) of this section if the participating candidate submits
368 documentation of the funds to the Director of Campaign Finance no later than the last day of the
369 120-day period” in its place.
370 (j) Section 335(a) (D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.35(a)is amended as follows:
371 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “not more than $2,000” and
372 inserting the phrase “not less than $100, but not more than $2,000” in its place.
15

373 (2) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
374 (A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “not more than
375 $4,000 for the first offense and not more than $10,000” and inserting the phrase “not less than
376 $250, but not more than $4,000 for the first offense and not less than $10,000” in its place.
377 (B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “not to exceed
378 $4,000 for the first offense, and not more than $10,000” and inserting the phrase “not less than
379 $500, but not more than $4,000 for the first offense, and not less than $10,000” in its place.
380 (C) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “not to exceed
381 $4,000” and inserting the phrase “not less than $250, but not more than $4,000” in its place.
382 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
383 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
384 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
385 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
386 Sec. 5. Effective date.
387 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
388 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
389 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
390 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
391 Columbia Register.
16